Alabama, session 2026rs, HB352.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Page 1

BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
HB352 INTRODUCED
Section 1. Section 40-18-372.1 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§40-18-372.1
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, on and after
January 1, 2027, the Secretary of Commerce may not find any
project to be a qualifying project under Section 40-18-372
unless the company seeking a job act incentive certifies that
the company, for the duration of any tax incentive received
under this article:
(1) Does not require mandatory overtime of any
employee;
(2) Does not engage in shift rotation whereby an
employee is asked or required to work a shift that changes
from one shift to another on a rotating basis;
(3) Does not require any employee to work weekends;
(4) Entitles an employee to at least 40 hours annually
of paid emergency leave;
(5) Guarantees a 40 hour work week unless an
unforeseeable event occurs that threatens the health, safety,
or welfare of the employees;
(6) Does not require any employee to perform tasks that
would reasonably be considered part of an employee's job
duties before or after the employee has clocked in or out or
outside the employee's shift; and
(7) Does not require an employee to use any portion of
his or her entitled break time to transit from the employee's
work station to a bathroom or breakroom.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
Page 2

Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
HB352 INTRODUCED
1, 2026.
Page 3